Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-173
Red Willow.

The county of Red Willow shall contain that territory described as townships one, two, three and four, north, of ranges twenty-six, twenty-seven, twenty-eight, twenty-nine and thirty, west.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 64, p. 224;

R.S.1913, § 888;

C.S.1922, § 790;

C.S.1929, § 25-177;

R.S.1943, § 22-173.